src-fst-oahpa-filer-aff-adjectives-oahpa.lexc.md
# Adjective affixes

This is one of two parallel files containing adjective affixes.
The files represent two alternative interpretation of the same data
(South Saami adjectives).
This file is used for dictionary and icall applications, the alternative file
*adjectives.lexc* is used for spellchecking.
This file is compiled by in
langs/sma giving the command *.configure --with-oahpa*
before compiling. The other file (adjectives.lexc) is compiled by default.

# Adjectives: Adjectival inflection sublexica

## Basic adjectival lexica, infl types

### even stems

Lexical exceptions


* **LEXICON A_LDH **


* **LEXICON NOERE **

* **LEXICON BUERIE **

* **LEXICON LEEVLES **

* **LEXICON SOOKES **

* **LEXICON SOOJMES **


* **LEXICON SMAAVE   **, both smaave and plaave

* **LEXICON SNAARE  **

* **LEXICON ORRE **

* **LEXICON STOERE **


* **LEXICON STOERE_COMP **

* **LEXICON NAAKE **

* **LEXICON GISSE **

* **LEXICON GAMTE **

* **LEXICON GIEVTE **

* **LEXICON KRUANA **

* **LEXICON VEELKES **


* **LEXICON ROOPSES **

* **LEXICON SNEEHPES  ** burde GEEHPES -> SNEEHPES ? ikke dokumentert geehpebe. s_S_ODD  bort?

* **LEXICON GEEHPES **

* **LEXICON GEERVE **

* **LEXICON TJOEVKES **

* **LEXICON SAETNIES **

* **LEXICON SUVHTJIES **


* **LEXICON SAEBRIES  **

* **LEXICON MUJVIES  **


* **LEXICON STAERIES  **

* **LEXICON GIERIES  **

* **LEXICON BAERIES  **

* **LEXICON GÆHTJOES  **

* **LEXICON AAREH **

* **LEXICON MOOREH **




## Regular even stem types


* **LEXICON EVTEBE   **

* **LEXICON ATTR_EVEN   **

* **LEXICON ATTR_ODD   **


* **LEXICON ø_Ø_EVEN  **

* **LEXICON IJVEadj **


* **LEXICON LES  ** Should contain only loanwords (?)


* **LEXICON IJAALE_A_LOAN **


* **LEXICON AATE_adj_LOAN  **


* **LEXICON AALE **

* **LEXICON AALEFORMS **

* **LEXICON oe_OE_EVEN  **


* **LEXICON e_E_EVEN  **

    - **LEXICON e_E_EVENNOCOMP  **

    - **LEXICON a_A_EVENNOCOMP  **

* **LEXICON a_A_EVEN **


* **LEXICON ie_IE_EVEN  **

    - **LEXICON ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP  **

* **LEXICON es_ES_EVEN  **

    - **LEXICON es_ES_EVENNOCOMP  **

* **LEXICON ies_IES_EVEN  **

    - **LEXICON ies_IES_EVENNOCOMP  **


* **LEXICON Cs_CS_EVEN  **


* **LEXICON ihks_IHKS_EVENNOCOMP **


* **LEXICON RAARH   ** Attr= h, Comp =Even( Jïjtje-raarh)



* **LEXICON MAST **

### type 2

* **LEXICON JELLE **

* **LEXICON UELLE **


* **LEXICON e_ES_LOAN   ** LOAN  - fjerna comp LA - vi kan vurdere om noen av disse bør ha komp.


* **LEXICON ÆRE   ** LOAN

* **LEXICON ENTE   ** LOAN




* **LEXICON LES_LASSE_ie  ** derivasjon av verb

* **LEXICON LES_LASSE_NOM_ie  **


* **LEXICON LES_LASSE_OBL_ie  **


* **LEXICON e_ES_EVEN  **

    - **LEXICON e_ES_EVENNOCOMP  **

* **LEXICON e_ES_ODDEVEN  **


* **LEXICON es_E_EVEN   **

* **LEXICON en_E_EVEN   **


* **LEXICON as_A_EVEN   ** attr= s, pred= e, comp=EVEN(ebe,emes), Case/Substantvien hammoe= EVEN

* **LEXICON oes_OE_EVEN   ** attr= s, pred= Ø, Comp= EVEN(ebe, emes) case/substantiven hammoe= Even

    - **LEXICON oes_OE_EVENNOCOMP  **

* **LEXICON ies_IE_EVEN   ** attr= s, pred. = Ø, comp jih case: even (ebe/emes/esne)
* **LEXICON ies_IE_EVENNOCOMP   ** attr= s, pred. = Ø, comp jih case: even (ebe/emes/esne)


* **LEXICON ies_(ehke)_IE_EHKE_ODDCOMPe_EVEN  **

* **LEXICON ies_(ehke)_IES_EHKE_ODDCOMPe_EVEN  **

* **LEXICON ies_(ehke)_EHKE_ODDCOMPe_EVEN **



* **LEXICON ies_IES_IE_EVEN   ** Comp & case = even (ebe/emes/esne)

* **LEXICON ies_IES_IE_EVENNOCOMP   ** Attr=s, Pred. = s jih Ø, Comp jih caese= even (ebe/emes/esne)

* **LEXICON as_AS_EVEN   ** Attr=s, Pred. = s jih Ø, Comp jih caese= even (ebe/emes/esne)


* **LEXICON IJLE_LOAN_A **


* **LEXICON s_H_EVENNOCOMP   **


# ODD-stems (odd stem declension)


## type 0 (attr only)

* **LEXICON ATTR_es_s  ** aajtijes


## type 1



* **LEXICON ø_Ø_ODD  **

* **LEXICON ah_AH_ODD    ** XXX mangler CASE - hva er riktig - kanskje EVEN?


* **LEXICON ah_AH_ODDNOCOMP   **

* **LEXICON hth_HTH_ODD  **

* **LEXICON Ce_CE_ODD   ** bårreske

* **LEXICON ege_EGE_ODDEVEN  ** rudtjege


* **LEXICON s_S_Ø_ODD  ** hamhpas



* **LEXICON s_E_ODD  **

* **LEXICON as_AS_ODD  **

    - **LEXICON as_AS_ODDNOCOMP  **



* **LEXICON s_S_ODD  **

    - **LEXICON s_S_ODDNOCOMP  **

* **LEXICON es_ES_ODDhk  **

* **LEXICON oes_OES_ODD  **

    - **LEXICON oes_OES_ODDNOCOMP  **

* **LEXICON oes_OES_ODDahk  **

* **LEXICON oes_OES_ODDas  **


* **LEXICON Ces_CES_ODDNOCOMP   **

* **LEXICON les_LES_ODD   **

* **LEXICON Cs_CS_CE_ODD  **

    - **LEXICON Cs_CS_CE_ODDNOCOMP  **


* **LEXICON Cs_CS_ODD  **

    - **LEXICON Cs_CS_ODDNOCOMP  **

* **LEXICON hts_HTS_ODD  **

    - **LEXICON hts_HTS_ODDNOCOMP  **



* **LEXICON an_AN_ODDNOCOMP **


## type 2

* **LEXICON AABELE **


* **LEXICON IJBELE **

* **LEXICON Ce_CES_ODD  **

* **LEXICON ø_S_ODDEVEN   ** , Comp=even jih ODD, Case= ODD

* **LEXICON ø_S_ODD   ** , Comp=even jih ODD, Case= ODD



## type 3


* **LEXICON JEASIEGOELKIJE **



* __LEXICON BÅETIJE !   __ bårreske

* **LEXICON jes_js_JES_JS_ODD  ** to adj: bualijes, fååmijes


* **LEXICON ijes_ijs_IJE_ODD  ** GUALIJES

* **LEXICON ijes_ijs_IJE_ODDNOCOMP  ** DÅAJMIJES






## type 3



* **LEXICON Cs_CE_ODD  **

    - **LEXICON Cs_CE_ODDNOCOMP  **

* **LEXICON Ces_CE_ODD  **


    - **LEXICON Ces_CE_ODDNOCOMP  **


* **LEXICON Ces_Ce_CES_CE_ODD    ** as Ces_CES_CE_ODD, but with ATTR_0

    - **LEXICON Ces_Ce_CES_CE_ODDNOCOMP **

* **LEXICON Ce_Ces_CES_CE_ODD   **

    - **LEXICON Ce_Ces_CES_CE_ODDNOCOMP **


* **LEXICON Ces_CES_CE_ODD  **


    - **LEXICON Ces_CES_CE_ODDNOCOMP  **

* **LEXICON hks_hke_HKS_HKE_ODD   **


## type 4

* **LEXICON as_AN_ODD  **


* **LEXICON oes_AN_ODD  **


* **LEXICON s_N_ODD  **

    - **LEXICON s_N_ODDNOCOMP  **




* **LEXICON ah_AN_ODDNOCOMP  **




* **LEXICON oeh_OEH_ODDNOCOMP **

* **LEXICON oeh_OEN_ODD **



* **LEXICON oeh_AN_ODD  **

    - **LEXICON oeh_AN_ODDNOCOMP  **


* **LEXICON oeh_OEH_AN_ODD   **


    - **LEXICON oeh_OEH_AN_ODDNOCOMP  **



* **LEXICON ø_N_ODD  **



* **LEXICON e_AN_ODD  **


* **LEXICON ies_EME **






* **LEXICON HKE_ODD_NGCOMP **

* **LEXICON HKE_ODD_COMP  **



* **LEXICON GEERUVE **

* **LEXICON JAEDTUVES **

## Attribute lexica

* **LEXICON ATTR_0_PRED_0 **

* **LEXICON ATTR_0 **


* **LEXICON ATTR_S **

* **LEXICON ATTR_H **

* **LEXICON ATTR_N **

* **LEXICON ATTRCONT **

## Predicative lexica


* **LEXICON PRED_0 **


* **LEXICON PRED_S **

* **LEXICON PRED_H **


* **LEXICON PRED_N **

* **LEXICON PRED_AN **




# Odd syllabic stems - adjectives

* **LEXICON ODDCASE **

    - **LEXICON ODDCASENOM **

    - **LEXICON ODDCASEOBL **

* **LEXICON ije_ODDCASE **

    - **LEXICON ije_ODDCASENOM **

    - **LEXICON ije_ODDCASEOBL **




# Even syllabic stems - adjectives

* **LEXICON eCASE **

    - **LEXICON eCASENOM **

    - **LEXICON eCASEOBL **



* **LEXICON aCASE **


    - **LEXICON aCASENOM **

    - **LEXICON aCASEOBL **

* **LEXICON ieCASE **

    - **LEXICON ieCASEOBL **


* **LEXICON oeCASE **

    - **LEXICON oeCASE_NOMSG **

    - **LEXICON oeCASE_OBL **

    - **LEXICON A_OE_SGILL_UML **

    - **LEXICON A_OE **

    - **LEXICON A_OE_SG **

    - **LEXICON A_OE_PL **

    - **LEXICON A_OE_ESS **







# Comparative forms

* **LEXICON EVENCOMP **

    - **LEXICON EVENCOMPONLY **


    - **LEXICON EVENSUPONLY **

* **LEXICON EVENCOMP_oe **

* **LEXICON ODDCOMP **


* **LEXICON EVENCOMPCASE **

* **LEXICON EVENCOMPCASE_oe **



* **LEXICON DIMCOMP **


* **LEXICON ÅBPOE **

    - **LEXICON ÅBPOE_SGILL_UML **

* **LEXICON ÅBPOE_N_OE **

    - **LEXICON ÅBPOE_N_OE_SG **

    - **LEXICON ÅBPOE_N_OE_PL **

    - **LEXICON ÅBPOE_N_OE_ESS **

* **LEXICON ABPA **


    - **LEXICON ABPA_SG **

    - **LEXICON ABPA_PL **

* **LEXICON MES **

* **LEXICON MES_oe **

* **LEXICON OMMES **


* **LEXICON LAAKAN **

* **LEXICON LEEJNES **






* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/oahpa-filer/aff-adjectives-oahpa.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-sma/blob/main/../src/fst/oahpa-filer/aff-adjectives-oahpa.lexc)</small>
